District of Columbia statutes.
1-621.09c

Information about the other post-employment benefits system.

Upon request by the Chief Financial Officer, the Mayor and the head of any District agency or instrumentality shall furnish to the Chief Financial Officer information with respect to the benefits system to which this subchapter applies as the Chief Financial Officer considers necessary to enable it to carry out its responsibilities under this subchapter and to enable the enrolled actuary engaged pursuant to §  1-621.09(a) to carry out its responsibilities under this subchapter.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2109c
as added Dec. 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-151, § 2(c), 61 DCR 8893